District of Columbia statutes.
29-412.03

Articles of dissolution.

(a)

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the nonprofit corporation may dissolve by delivering to the Mayor for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

(1)

The name of the corporation;

(2)

The date dissolution was authorized; and

(3)

That the dissolution was approved in the manner required by this chapter and by the articles of incorporation and bylaws.

(b)

A nonprofit corporation shall be dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

(c)

For purposes of this part, the term “dissolved corporation” means a nonprofit corporation whose articles of dissolution have become effective and includes a successor entity to which the remaining assets of the corporation are transferred subject to its liabilities for purposes of liquidation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720